Florida, session 2026, HB1553.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (2) of section 768.0427, Florida
Statutes, is amended to read:
768.0427 Admissibility of evidence to prove or rebut
medical expenses in personal injury or wrongful death actions;
disclosure of letters of protection; recovery of past and future
medical expenses damages.—
(2) ADMISSIBLE EVIDENCE OF MEDICAL TREATMENT OR SERVICE
EXPENSES.—Evidence offered to prove or rebut the amount of
damages for past or future medical treatment or services in a
personal injury or wrongful death action shall be is admissible
as follows: provided in this subsection.
(a) Evidence offered to prove the amount of damages for
past medical treatment or services that have been satisfied is
limited to evidence of the amount actually paid, regardless of
the source of payment.
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1553-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1553 2026
(b) Evidence any party may offer offered to prove or rebut
the amount necessary to satisfy unpaid charges for incurred
medical treatment or services shall include, but is not limited
to, the following: evidence as provided in this paragraph.
1. If the claimant has health care coverage other than
Medicare or Medicaid, evidence of the amount which such health
care coverage is obligated to pay the health care provider to
satisfy the charges for the claimant's incurred medical
treatment or services, plus the claimant's share of medical
expenses under the insurance contract or regulation.
2. If the claimant has health care coverage but obtains
treatment under a letter of protection or otherwise does not
submit charges for any health care provider's medical treatment
or services to health care coverage, evidence of the amount the
claimant's health care coverage would pay the health care
provider to satisfy the past unpaid medical charges under the
insurance contract or regulation, plus the claimant's share of
medical expenses under the insurance contract or regulation, had
the claimant obtained medical services or treatment pursuant to
the health care coverage.
3. If the claimant does not have health care coverage or
has health care coverage through Medicare or Medicaid, evidence
of 120 percent of the Medicare reimbursement rate in effect on
the date of the claimant's incurred medical treatment or
services, or, if there is no applicable Medicare rate for a
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1553-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1553 2026
service, 170 percent of the applicable state Medicaid rate.
4. If the claimant obtains medical treatment or services
under a letter of protection and the health care provider
subsequently transfers the right to receive payment under the
letter of protection to a third party, evidence of the amount
the third party paid or agreed to pay the health care provider
in exchange for the right to receive payment pursuant to the
letter of protection.
5. Any evidence of reasonable amounts billed to the
claimant for medically necessary treatment or medically
necessary services provided to the claimant.
(c) Evidence any party may offer offered to prove or rebut
the amount of damages for any future medical treatment or
services the claimant will receive shall include, but is not
limited to, the following: evidence as provided in this
paragraph.
1. If the claimant has health care coverage other than
Medicare or Medicaid, or is eligible for any such health care
coverage, evidence of the amount for which the future charges of
health care providers could be satisfied if submitted to such
health care coverage, plus the claimant's share of medical
expenses under the insurance contract or regulation.
2. If the claimant does not have health care coverage or
has health care coverage through Medicare or Medicaid, or is
eligible for such health care coverage, evidence of 120 percent
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1553-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1553 2026
of the Medicare reimbursement rate in effect at the time of
trial for the medical treatment or services the claimant will
receive, or, if there is no applicable Medicare rate for a
service, 170 percent of the applicable state Medicaid rate.
3. Any evidence of reasonable future amounts to be billed
to the claimant for medically necessary treatment or medically
necessary services.
(d) This subsection does not impose an affirmative duty
upon any party to seek a reduction in billed charges to which
the party is not contractually entitled or to offer any specific
evidence made admissible by this subsection.
(e) Individual contracts between providers and authorized
commercial insurers or authorized health maintenance
organizations are not subject to discovery or disclosure and are
not admissible into evidence.
Section 2. The amendments made by this act to s.
768.0427(2), Florida Statutes, are intended to clarify existing
law.
Section 3. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1553-01-c1